Vermont, session 2025-2026, H708.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The State Flag has evolved in design over the centuries since its
enactment into legislation in 1803. Codified at 1 V.S.A. § 495 as “blue with
the Coat of Arms of the State thereon,” the General Assembly approved
Vermont’s current design more than a century ago, in 1923.
(2) The Coat of Arms still retains its original design, enacted into
legislation in 1862 and codified at 1 V.S.A. § 491(1): “Green, a landscape
occupying half of the shield; on the right and left, in the background, high
mountains, blue; the sky, yellow. From near the base and reaching nearly to
the top of the shield, arises a pine tree of the natural color and between three
VT LEG #385501 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.708
2026 Page 2 of 4
erect sheaves, yellow, placed diagonally on the right side and a red cow
standing on the left side of the field.”
(b) Purpose. The purpose of this act is to facilitate, through the work of a
task force and public input, the creation of a new State Flag that is distinctive
and reflects the shared vision of Vermont’s current and future identity.
Sec. 2. STATE FLAG; TASK FORCE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the State Flag Task Force to recommend a
new State Flag.
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Secretary of State or designee;
(2) the State Archivist or designee;
(3) the State Curator or designee;
(4) the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or designee;
(5) the State Historic Preservation Officer or designee;
(6) the Executive Director of Racial Equity or designee;
(7) the Chair of the Vermont Commission on Native American Affairs
or designee;
(8) the Executive Director of the Vermont Historical Society or
designee;
VT LEG #385501 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.708
2026 Page 3 of 4
(9) the Executive Director of the Vermont Arts Council or designee; and
(10) the Executive Director of Vermont Humanities or designee.
(c) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall recommend to the General
Assembly a proposal for a new State Flag. As part of its work, the Task Force
shall solicit proposals from the public for a new State Flag.
(d) Assistance. The Task Force shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Office of the Secretary of State.
(e) Report. On or before March 31, 2027, the Task Force shall submit a
preliminary progress report to the House Committee on Government
Operations and Military Affairs and Senate Committee on Government
Operations; and, on or before December 1, 2027, the Task Force shall submit
to the Committees its findings and any recommendations for legislative action,
including whether to seek voter approval of the final design in the November
2028 general election.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Secretary of State shall call the first meeting of the Task Force
to occur on or before September 15, 2026.
(2) The Task Force shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Task Force shall cease to exist on December 31, 2027.
VT LEG #385501 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.708
2026 Page 4 of 4
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Task Force who
are not otherwise compensated or reimbursed for their attendance shall be
entitled to compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than eight meetings.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385501 v.5